Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1 General Provisions
VTD: 4-1 Cherry Hill

VTD: 4-2 Rock Castle

VTD: 4-3 Courthouse

VTD: 5-1 Johnson Chapel

VTD: 5-2 Elementary School

VTD: 7 Church of Christ Annex

Blocks (920200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004

Smith County

Sumner County

VTD: 01 Westmoreland

Blocks (020101): 2046

Blocks (020601): 2005 2089 2090 2091 2093

Blocks (020602): 1000 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1092 1093 1096

VTD: 03 Bethpage

VTD: 03 Cairo

VTD: 03 Castalian Springs

VTD: 03 Civic Center

VTD: 05 South Water

Blocks (020901): 1029 1030 1031 1039 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053

Blocks (020902): 1017 1019 1020 1021 1024 1025

VTD: 06 Gallatin Sr. High School

VTD: 06 Jack Anderson

VTD: 06 Vol State

Trousdale County

District 41:

Fentress County

VTD: Banner Springs

VTD: Clarkrange

VTD: Courthouse

VTD: Grimsley

VTD: Shirley

VTD: York Elementary

Jackson County

Morgan County

Overton County

District 42:

Putnam County

VTD: 01A Capshaw

VTD: 01C South Cookeville

VTD: 02A Northeast Elementary

VTD: 03A University

VTD: 05A Cookeville Community Center

VTD: 05C Prescott South

VTD: 05F Dry Valley

VTD: 06A Cane Creek

VTD: 07A Burgess Falls

VTD: 07D Twin Oak

VTD: 08D Boma

VTD: 08E Buffalo Valley

VTD: 08F Cornerstone Middle

VTD: 08G Upperman

VTD: 09A Double Springs North

VTD: 09B Double Springs South

VTD: 10 Pavilion

VTD: 10B Sycamore

VTD: 11A Bangham

VTD: 11B Cookeville High School

VTD: 12A Algood Inside

VTD: 12B Algood Outside

VTD: 12C Brotherton

District 43:

Grundy County

Warren County

VTD: 01-1 McMinnville Civic Center

VTD: 04-1 TSU Nursery Res. Center

VTD: 05-1 Three Star Mall

VTD: 05-2 Beersheba Towers

VTD: 06-1 Warren Co. Middle School

VTD: 07-1 East Side School

VTD: 08-1 Fairview Community Center

VTD: 08-2 Irving College School

VTD: 10-1 Centertown One

VTD: 11-1 Midway Community Center

VTD: 11-2 Hwy 56 N Church of Christ

VTD: 12-1 Northside Baptist Church

VTD: 12-2 Lucky Community Center

White County

District 44:

Sumner County

VTD: 01 Corinth

VTD: 01 North Sumner

VTD: 01 Westmoreland

Blocks (020101): 1000 1003 1004 1005 1006 1009 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101

Blocks (020102): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3047 3048 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4059 4062 4063 4064 4065 4066 4071 4072 4073 4074 4076

Blocks (020601): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2017 2018 2019 2021 2022 2023 2025 2070 2092

Blocks (020602): 1001

VTD: 02 Portland

VTD: 02 Wiseman

VTD: 03 Bushes Chapel

VTD: 04 County Admin. Bldg.

VTD: 04 Salem

VTD: 04 Union Elementary

VTD: 05 Gallatin City Hall

VTD: 05 South Water

Blocks (020603): 1023 1024 1025

Blocks (020700): 1025

Blocks (020901): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1008 1009 1054

Blocks (020902): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1022 1023 1026 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027

VTD: 07 Saundersville

VTD: 09 Nannie Berry

Blocks (021204): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2022 2023 2024 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3034

VTD: 09 Rock Castle

Blocks (021201): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 4002 4003

Blocks (021204): 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3035

VTD: 12 Oakmont

Blocks (020206): 1037 1038 1039

Blocks (020207): 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019

Blocks (020403): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1030

Blocks (020404): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1025 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1038 1039 1042

District 45:

Sumner County

VTD: 04 Cottontown

VTD: 07 Long Hollow

VTD: 07 Magnet School

VTD: 08 Brown Elementary

VTD: 08 Lakeside

VTD: 09 Indian Lake

VTD: 09 Nannie Berry

Blocks (021201): 1000

Blocks (021204): 2025

Blocks (021205): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 2028 2031 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051

VTD: 09 Rock Castle

Blocks (021201): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2009 2013 2014 4008 4009 4010 4011

VTD: 10 Center Point

VTD: 10 Trinity

VTD: 10 Walton Ferry

VTD: 11 Hunter

VTD: 11 Madison Creek

VTD: 11 Millersville

VTD: 12 Oakmont

Blocks (020403): 1039 1040 1041

Blocks (020404): 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1026 1037 1040 1041 1043 1044

Blocks (020405): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1023 1024 1026 1027 1028

Blocks (020406): 2000 2001 2002

VTD: 12 White House City Hall

VTD: 12 White House Middle School

District 46:

Cannon County

DeKalb County

VTD: 3 Middle School

Blocks (920200): 1017 1019

Blocks (920300): 1072 1073 1076 1077 1081 1082

VTD: 6-1 Belk

VTD: 6-2 Keltonburg

VTD: 6-3 Blue Springs

VTD: 7 Church of Christ Annex

Blocks (920102): 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008

Blocks (920200): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1018 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 2026 2027 2029 2030 2038 2042 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 3073 3080 3081 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3091 4007 4019 4020 4029 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4051 4052

Wilson County

VTD: 04 Cooks UMC Church

Blocks (030204): 2052 2061 2062 2116 2117

VTD: 05 Berea Church of Christ

Blocks (030101): 1044 1060 1066 1067 1071 1072 1073 1074 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1103 2024 2026 2045 2047 2078 2079 2080 2081

Blocks (030204): 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2060 2063 2064 2065 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2114 2115 2118 2119

VTD: 06 Carroll-Oakland School

Blocks (030101): 2046 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068

VTD: 07 Shop Springs Baptist Church

VTD: 07 Southside Elementary School

VTD: 07 Watertown High School

VTD: 09 Commerce Cumberland Pres. Church

VTD: 09 Cottage Home Dem. Club

VTD: 09 Statesville Home Dem. Club

VTD: 09 Watertown Community Center

VTD: 12 Cedars of Leb. St. Park Assembly Hall

Blocks (030903): 3023 3024 3025

Blocks (030904): 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1119 1120 1123 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2096 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2119 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136 2137 2138 2139 2140 2141 2142 2143 2144 2145 2146 2147 2148 2149 2150 2151 2152 2155 2156 2157 2158 2159 2160 2163 2164 2165 2166 2167

VTD: 12 Norene Community Center

VTD: 14 Gladeville Elementary

Blocks (030800): 1127 1128

Blocks (030903): 1007 1008 1034 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1080 1081 1082 1083 1120 1167 1169 1170 1171 1172 1173 1174 1175 1176 1177 1178 1179 1180 1181 1182 1183 1184 1185 1197 1200 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022

Blocks (030904): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1007 1008 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1060 1061 1062 1063 1118 1122

VTD: 14 Wilson County Board of Education

VTD: 15 Tuckers Cross Roads School

VTD: 17 Faith Evangelical Lutheran Church

VTD: 19 Jimmy Floyd Family Center

Blocks (030101): 2043 2044 2048 2049 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077

Blocks (030500): 1007 1008 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049

VTD: 20 Market Street Community Center

Blocks (030102): 3065 3069

Blocks (030500): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4018

Blocks (030700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1011 1012 1013 1014 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1049 1053 1056 2000 2001 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036

VTD: 21 Water & Wastewater Auth. Of Wilson Co.

VTD: 23 West Hills Baptist Church

VTD: 24 First United Methodist Church

VTD: 25 Leeville Club House

Blocks (030202): 1018 1070 1082 1089 3023 3024 3025 3026 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3090

VTD: 25 Maple Hill Church of Christ

District 47:

Coffee County

Warren County

VTD: 02-1 Courthouse

VTD: 02-2 Warren County Airport

VTD: 03-1 Westwood Church of Christ

VTD: 03-2 Smartt Station Fire Hall

VTD: 08-3 LBJ & C Headstart

VTD: 09-1 Morrison Ruritan Club

VTD: 09-2 Viola Valley Comm. Center

VTD: 10-2 Centertown Comm. Ctr.

District 48:

Rutherford County

VTD: 02-1 Lascassas School

VTD: 02-2 Walter Hill School

Blocks (040502): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 2009 2010 2011 2012 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024

Blocks (041000): 1000 1038

Blocks (041101): 1035 1036 1038 1041 1042 1043 1044 1054 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2013 2014 2015 2016 2020 2026 2027 2034 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3014 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3037 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3048 3053 3054 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4025

VTD: 02-3 Milton Fire Hall

VTD: 04-1 Advent Lutheran Church

VTD: 04-2 Bud's Tire Shop

VTD: 04-3 Kittrell School IV

VTD: 04-4 Oakland High School

VTD: 06-1 Buchanan School

VTD: 06-2 Christiana Middle School

VTD: 06-3 Kittrell School VI

VTD: 14-2 Siegal Elementary School

Blocks (041101): 2011 2012 2017 2018 2019 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2028 2031 2033 2035 3015 3034 3035 3036 3038 3052

VTD: 15-1 Kingwood Church of Christ

Blocks (041101): 1007 1009 1010 1011 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1031 1033 1034 1037 1039 1040 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 2029 2030 2032 2036 3013 3044 3045 3046 3047 3049 3050 3051 3055 4005 4006 4007 4008 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024

Blocks (041401): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1035 1036 1037 1038

Blocks (041402): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008

VTD: 17-1 North Blvd Church of Christ

VTD: 18-1 Patterson Park

Blocks (041800): 3053

Blocks (042000): 2000 3024

Blocks (042100): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1027 1030 1031

VTD: 18-2 Mid TN Realtors Association Bldg

Blocks (041201): 1000 1001 1002 1010 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1053 1054 1060

Blocks (041800): 3046 3056 3060 3061 3062 3077

VTD: 21-1 Hobgood School

District 49:

Rutherford County

VTD: 01-1 LaVergne City Hall

Blocks (040104): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028

VTD: 01-2 Roy Waldron School

Blocks (040103): 1013 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1071 1074

VTD: 03-3 Wilson Elementary School

Blocks (040403): 4002 4003 4013 4014

Blocks (042200): 3021

VTD: 03-4 Florence Baptist Church

VTD: 05-1 First Baptist Church of LaVergne

Blocks (040104): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016

Blocks (040105): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006

Blocks (040200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062

Blocks (040805): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2021 2022 2025 2026 2027

Blocks (042200): 3072

VTD: 08-1 Blackman United Methodist Church

Blocks (040807): 3012 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3023 3028

VTD: 09-1 Stewart Creek Elementary

Blocks (040302): 1010 1011 1012 1020 1021 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1058 1059 1060 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1071 1072 1073 1075

Blocks (040806): 4003 4008

Blocks (040807): 1005

VTD: 09-2 Giles Creek Baptist Church

VTD: 10-1 Cedar Grove Elementary

VTD: 10-2 Stewartsboro School

Blocks (040302): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1022 1061 1062 1063 1064 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2022 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3013 3027 3064

Blocks (040308): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1005 1008 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1024 1025 1027 1028 1029 1030 1032 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2014 2015 2016 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036

Blocks (040806): 3013 3014 3021 4000

VTD: 10-3 Rock Springs School III

VTD: 11-1 Smyrna Middle School

Blocks (040303): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028

Blocks (040304): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041

Blocks (040305): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028

Blocks (040306): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1016

Blocks (042200): 1007 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1022 1023 1024 1041 2009 2031

Blocks (042300): 1044 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068

VTD: 12-1 Tennessee Rehab Center

Blocks (040403): 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4055

Blocks (042200): 3002 3003 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3022 3023 3024 3026 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3081 3085 3086 3087 3088 3089 3090 3091

VTD: 19-3 Lane Agri-Park

Blocks (040901): 1055

VTD: 20-1 Creekmont General Baptist Church

Blocks (040302): 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1070 1074 3012 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3055 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3065 3067 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040

Blocks (040807): 1000 1001 1003 1007 1008

Blocks (040808): 1000

VTD: 20-2 Blackman Middle School

Blocks (040901): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1038 1041 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1093 1100 1102 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2061 2062 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068

Blocks (042300): 1092 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1152 1153 1154 1155 1156 1157 1158 1159 1160 1163 1179 1185

District 50:

Davidson County

VTD: 01-1 1st Baptist Church of Joelton

VTD: 01-2 Greenville UMC

VTD: 01-4 Scottsboro Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 03-1 Union Hill 1st Baptist Church

VTD: 03-2 Joelton Elem School

VTD: 03-8 Davidson Academy

Blocks (010201): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1017 1026

VTD: 10-1 Luton's UMC

VTD: 10-2 Walker Creek UMC

VTD: 10-3 Goodlettsville Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 10-4 First Baptist Church of Goodlettsville

Blocks (010202): 1009

Blocks (010301): 2001 2002 2003 2011

Blocks (010302): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 2041 2042 2044 2045 2046 2047

Blocks (010303): 1010 1012 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1028 1029 1030 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017

VTD: 10-6 Gateway School

VTD: 22-1 Bellevue Comm Ctr

VTD: 22-2 Bellevue Church of Christ

VTD: 22-3 Bellevue Middle School

VTD: 22-4 Bellevue UMC

VTD: 23-2 West Meade School

Blocks (018202): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006

VTD: 35-1 Gower School

Blocks (018301): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1021 1022 1023 1024 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3022 3023 3024 3025 4002 4003 4004

Blocks (018302): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1067

VTD: 35-2 South Harpeth Church of Christ

VTD: 35-3 Harpeth Valley School

VTD: 35-4 Bellevue UMC

VTD: 35-5 Jewish Comm. Ctr.

District 51:

Davidson County

VTD: 04-2 Madison Library

Blocks (010701): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1017 4001

Blocks (010702): 1000 1001 1002 1003 2006

VTD: 04-4 Windland Retirement Center

Blocks (010701): 1007 1008 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1018 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 4000 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013

Blocks (010702): 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019

Blocks (011100): 1009 1010 1012 1013 2000 2001 2002

VTD: 05-2 Cleveland St. Park Comm Ctr

Blocks (012702): 2050

Blocks (019300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1010 1011 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022

VTD: 05-4 McFerrin Park Comm. Ctr.

Blocks (019300): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1016

VTD: 05-5 Ross Elementary School

Blocks (011700): 7008 7009 7010 7011 7012 7013 7014 7015 7016 7018 7019 7020

Blocks (011900): 1000 1001 1002 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 3000 3001 3002 3003 3005

VTD: 06-1 Martha O'Bryan Center

Blocks (012200): 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1031 1032 1033 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028

Blocks (019200): 1003 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1049 1050 1053 1054 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 4000 4001 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021

Blocks (019300): 1078 1079 1080 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098

VTD: 06-2 Shelby Comm. Ctr.

Blocks (012100): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 2000 2001 2002 2003 2008 2009 2010 2016 2017

Blocks (012200): 1014 1021 1022 1023 1028 1029 1030 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 3011 3019 3020

Blocks (019200): 1000 1001 1002 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1016 1017 1018

VTD: 06-3 East Park Comm. Center

Blocks (011900): 3004 3018 3020

Blocks (019200): 4002 4003 4004 4005 4015 4016

Blocks (019300): 1012 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1075 1076 1077 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1099 2000 2001 2002 2003 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009

VTD: 06-5 Cora Howe Elem School

Blocks (011700): 1001 1002 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1016 1017 1018 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 3004 3005 3006 3013 3014 3015 3016

Blocks (012100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007

VTD: 07-1 Stratford High School

Blocks (011400): 2004 2008 2009

Blocks (011500): 1013 1014 1017 1018 1019 1020 1022 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020

Blocks (011600): 1002 1005 1006 1008 1009 2009 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014

Blocks (011700): 1003 1004 1005 1012 1013 1014 1015

VTD: 07-2 Dalewood UMC

VTD: 07-3 Memorial Lutheran Church

Blocks (011400): 1000 1001 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024

Blocks (011500): 1004 1005 1006 1015 1016 1021

VTD: 07-4 Cornelia Fort Air Park

VTD: 07-5 Aldergate UMC

VTD: 08-3 Brush Hill Cumberland Pres.

VTD: 08-4 Dalewood Baptist Church

Blocks (011100): 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007

Blocks (011200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 4000 4001 4002 5002 6000 6001 6002 6003 6004 6005 6006 6007 6008 6009 6010 6011

VTD: 09-1 Madison Park Comm. Ctr

VTD: 09-2 Madison Firehall

VTD: 09-3 Neely's Bend Middle School

VTD: 10-5 Parkway Baptist Church

Blocks (010401): 2011 2012 2013 2014 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023

VTD: 11-1 Old Hickory Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 11-2 Lakewood City Hall

VTD: 15-1 Two Rivers School

Blocks (015300): 3008 3014 3016 3017 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032

VTD: 15-7 Margaret Allen School

Blocks (019600): 2084 2085

VTD: 19-2 15th Ave Baptist Church

Blocks (019400): 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2078 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113

VTD: 19-4 Kayne Av Baptist Church

Blocks (019400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1058 1059 1070

Blocks (019500): 1013 1024 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1041 1042 1043 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1152 1153 1154 1155 1156 1157 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2138 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 4000 4001 4002 4003 4009 4010 4011 4012 4015 4016 4017 4018 4048 4049 4050

VTD: 6-4 Main Library

District 52:

Davidson County

VTD: 06-1 Martha O'Bryan Center

Blocks (012100): 2044 2045 2046 2047

Blocks (012200): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3007 3008 3009

VTD: 06-2 Shelby Comm. Ctr.

Blocks (012100): 1020 2004 2005 2006 2007 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2048 2049

Blocks (012200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1024 1025 1026 1027 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1051 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2019 2020 2032 3000 3005 3006 3010

VTD: 07-1 Stratford High School

Blocks (012100): 3007 3008 3009 3010

VTD: 13-1 Glencliff Presbyterian Church

VTD: 13-2 Glengarry School

VTD: 13-3 Vultee Firehall

VTD: 13-4 Whitworth Baptist Christ Church

Blocks (015610): 2024 2026 2027 2028 3021

Blocks (015612): 1000

Blocks (015617): 2000

Blocks (015619): 1001 2000 3000 3002 3003

Blocks (015624): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010

Blocks (015625): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018

Blocks (980100): 1000 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035

VTD: 15-4 Margaret Allen School

Blocks (015900): 2000 2001 2002 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2045

Blocks (019600): 2007 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2037 2038 2039 2040 2059 2060 2061 2062 2070 2071 2072 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2094

VTD: 15-5 Vultee Church of Christ

VTD: 16-3 Vultee Church of Christ

Blocks (015700): 1016 1027

Blocks (015802): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3012 3013 3021 4018

Blocks (017401): 2004

VTD: 16-5 Woodbine Baptist Church

Blocks (015700): 1022 1023 1025 1026

Blocks (017401): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2013

VTD: 16-6 Glencliff High School

Blocks (015700): 1019 1020 1021 1024

Blocks (019006): 1000 1001 1002 1003

VTD: 17-1 Napier Comm. Ctr

VTD: 26-1 Paragon Mills School

Blocks (019004): 1000 1001 1002

Blocks (019006): 1006 1008 1009 1010 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010

VTD: 28-1 Una Baptist Church

Blocks (015613): 1000 1001 1003 1004 1005 1023 3000 3002 3003

Blocks (015700): 1014 1015 1017 1018 1028 1030 1031 1032

Blocks (980100): 1037 1039 1040 1041

VTD: 28-4 Antioch Church of Christ

Blocks (015613): 1002 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1014 1019 1020

VTD: 29-1 Priest Lake Presbyterian

Blocks (015612): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1010 1011 1012 1013

Blocks (015617): 2016

VTD: 29-2 Lakeview School

VTD: 29-3 Hamilton UMC

Blocks (015612): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010

Blocks (015618): 1001 1002 1003 1004

VTD: 29-4 Smith Springs Church of Christ

VTD: 30-1 Haywood School

Blocks (019003): 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 3002 3005 3006 3007 3008

Blocks (019004): 1003 1004 1005 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009

VTD: 30-2 Haywood Hills Baptist

Blocks (019003): 3010 3011 3012

VTD: 30-3 Grace Cole School

Blocks (019004): 2000 2003 2017

VTD: 32-4 Spirit of Life Church

Blocks (015630): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2010 2014 2015 2016 2028

VTD: 32-5 Antioch Middle School

Blocks (015629): 3000 3016

VTD: 33-2 New Antioch High School

Blocks (015619): 3001 3004 3005 3006

VTD: 33-3 Southeast Library

VTD: 33-4 Hickory Hollow Baptist

Blocks (015626): 1004 1007 1008 1009 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 2000 2001 2002 2004 2005 2006 2007

Blocks (015628): 2000

Blocks (015629): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 2002 2004

District 53:

Davidson County

VTD: 16-4 Woodbine Cumberland Pres. Church

Blocks (980200): 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1051 1055 1059 1060 1061

VTD: 16-5 Woodbine Baptist Church

Blocks (017300): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 3040

Blocks (017401): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 2010 2011 2012

Blocks (017402): 1003 1004

Blocks (017500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1006 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005

VTD: 16-6 Glencliff High School

Blocks (017402): 1000 1001 1002 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006

Blocks (017500): 1004 1005 1007 1008 1009 1025 1026 1027 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041

Blocks (980200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1047 1048 1049 1050 1052 1053 1054 1056 1057 1058 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069

VTD: 17-5 Berry Hill City Hall

Blocks (017200): 1013 1014 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068

Blocks (017800): 1000 1001 1002 1014 1017

VTD: 17-6 Berry Headstart

Blocks (017200): 1012 1031 1032 1033 1034 1062 1063 2044 2049 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073

VTD: 26-3 Norman Binkley School

VTD: 27-1 Church of the Holy Spirit

VTD: 27-2 Ellington Agricultural Center

VTD: 27-3 McMurray Middle School

VTD: 27-4 Christ Church

Blocks (019105): 3007 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008

Blocks (019106): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005

VTD: 30-3 Grace Cole School

Blocks (019004): 2001 2002 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016

Blocks (019109): 2000 2001 2002

Blocks (019110): 1003 1004

VTD: 30-4 Tusculum Hills Baptist Church

Blocks (019110): 1000 1001 1002 1005 1006 1007 1008 2000 2001 2002 2003 2007

VTD: 31-2 Woodson Chapel Church of Christ

Blocks (019114): 1021

Blocks (019115): 1018 1019 1020 1027

Blocks (019116): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004

VTD: 31-3 Oasis Worship Centre

VTD: 32-1 Antioch UMC

Blocks (019110): 1009 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012

VTD: 32-2 Bell Road Baptist

Blocks (019112): 1000 1001 1002 1022

Blocks (019118): 2001 2002 2003 2006

VTD: 32-3 Cane Ridge Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 34-8 Glendale UMC

Blocks (017701): 1000

Blocks (017800): 1015

District 54:

Davidson County

VTD: 01-3 Temple Baptist Church

VTD: 01-5 Bordeaux Library

Blocks (012801): 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020

Blocks (012802): 1000 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4030 4031 4037

Blocks (013100): 2018 2019 2024

VTD: 01-6 Cathedral of Praise

Blocks (010105): 1011 1012 1013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 3000 3001 3002 3003 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005

Blocks (012801): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1021 1022 1023 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004

Blocks (012802): 1001 1002 1003 1006 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 4033

VTD: 02-1 Haynes Middle School

Blocks (012701): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011

Blocks (012702): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1017 1021 1022 1023 1026 1027

Blocks (012801): 4005 4006 4007 4008

VTD: 02-2 White's Creek Pk Fire Hall #25

Blocks (010904): 2029 2032

Blocks (012701): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2016

VTD: 02-3 Hillhurst Baptist Church

VTD: 02-4 Hillhurst Baptist Church

VTD: 02-6 Northwest YMCA

VTD: 03-4 Alex Green School

VTD: 03-5 Bellshire Elem. School

VTD: 03-6 Old Brick Church School

VTD: 03-7 New Brick Church Middle School

VTD: 03-8 Davidson Academy

Blocks (010201): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1020 1021 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 2000 2001 2002 2003

VTD: 04-1 Madison Station Senior Ctr

VTD: 04-2 Madison Library

Blocks (010802): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1010 1011 1012 1020 1021 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024

Blocks (010901): 1006 1007

Blocks (010903): 1000

VTD: 04-3 Windland Retirement Center

VTD: 04-4 Windland Retirement Center

Blocks (010802): 1017 1018 1019 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029

Blocks (011002): 1000 1001 1012

VTD: 05-1 Kipp Academy

Blocks (011300): 1001

VTD: 05-3 Eastland Baptist Church

Blocks (011700): 5006 5009 5010 5011

VTD: 06-5 Cora Howe Elem School

Blocks (011700): 1000 3000 3001 3002 3003 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 4007 4008 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016

VTD: 07-3 Memorial Lutheran Church

Blocks (011400): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 2000 2001 2002 2003 2005 2006 2007 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007

Blocks (011700): 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4009 4010

VTD: 08-1 Tom Joy School

Blocks (010903): 1004 1005 1006 1007

Blocks (011001): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4008 4009 4010 4014 4015 4022 4024 4025 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007

Blocks (011300): 1000 1002 1007 1008

VTD: 08-2 Gra-Mar School

VTD: 08-4 Dalewood Baptist Church

Blocks (011200): 5000 5001

VTD: 10-4 First Baptist Church of Goodlettsville

Blocks (010301): 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2012 2013 2014 2016 2017

Blocks (010302): 1007 1008

VTD: 10-5 Parkway Baptist Church

Blocks (010201): 1007 1016 3000 3001 3002 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008

Blocks (010301): 2015

Blocks (010401): 2016 2024

Blocks (010801): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021

VTD: 20-2 Union Hall 737

Blocks (013000): 1000 1001 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1019 1020 1021 1022 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040

District 55:

Davidson County

VTD: 17-10 Sevier Park Comm Ctr

VTD: 17-4 Sevier Park Comm. Center

Blocks (017100): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3016 3017

VTD: 18-1 Eakin Elementary

VTD: 18-2 Eakin Elementary

VTD: 18-3 Eakin Elementary

VTD: 18-6 Belmont University (Curb Event Center)

VTD: 18-7 Belmont Heights Baptist Church

Blocks (016300): 3016 3020 3021

Blocks (016400): 2007 2008 2009 2014 2015 2016 2017 2022

Blocks (016900): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011

Blocks (017000): 3004 3011 3013 3014 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027

VTD: 19-5 Murrell School

Blocks (016400): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1022 1023 2001 2003 2004 2005 2006 2010 2011 2012 2013

Blocks (019500): 2119 2120 2121

VTD: 20-2 Union Hall 737

Blocks (013000): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1017 1018 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1033

Blocks (013300): 1001 4005

VTD: 20-3 Union Hall 737

Blocks (013201): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2015

Blocks (013202): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013
